apertium-panm/apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
  <pardef n="ਜਾ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਓਗੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਓਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਓਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏਗਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏਗਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਨਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਨੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਨੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਉਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਵੇਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਓ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਏਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਏਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਈਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਈਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਓ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਂਦਾ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਂਦੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਂਦੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਂਦੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਂਦੀ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਜਾਕਰ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਜਾਕੇ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਗਿਆ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਗਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਗਏ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਗਈ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਗਈ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਗਈਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਗਈਂ</l><r>ਜਾ<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>

    <e lm="ਜਾ"><i></i><par n="ਜਾ__vblex_iv"/></e>
